Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 3. Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

Sec. 33.36.110.
Authorizing governor to execute interstate compact.

The governor of this state is authorized and directed to execute a compact on behalf of this state with any of the United States legally joining in the compact in the form substantially as follows:

History.

(§ 2 ch 138 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 61 SLA 2002)

INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR ADULT OFFENDER SUPERVISION

ARTICLE I PURPOSE AND POLICY

The compacting states to this Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision recognize that each state is responsible for the supervision of adult offenders in the community who are authorized in accordance with the by-laws and rules of this compact to travel across state lines both to and from each compacting state in such a manner as to track the location of offenders, transfer supervision authority in an orderly and efficient manner, and when necessary return offenders to the originating jurisdictions.

The compacting states also recognize that Congress, by enacting the Crime Control Act, 4 U.S.C. 112 (1965), has authorized and encouraged compacts for cooperative efforts and mutual assistance in the prevention of crime.

It is the purpose of this compact and the Interstate Commission created under this compact, through means of joint and cooperative action among the compacting states, to provide the framework for the promotion of public safety and protect the rights of victims through the control and regulation of the interstate movement of offenders in the community; to provide for the effective tracking, supervision, and rehabilitation of these offenders by the sending and receiving states; and to equitably distribute the costs, benefits, and obligations of the compact among the compacting states.

In addition, this compact will create an Interstate Commission that will establish uniform procedures to manage the movement between states of adults placed under community supervision and released to the community under the jurisdiction of courts, paroling authorities, corrections, or other criminal justice agencies that will adopt rules to achieve the purpose of this compact; ensure an opportunity for input and timely notice to victims and to jurisdictions where defined offenders are authorized to travel or to relocate across state lines; establish a system of uniform data collection, access to information on active cases by authorized criminal justice officials, and regular reporting of compact activities to heads of state councils, state executive, judicial, and legislative branches and criminal justice administrators; monitor compliance with rules governing interstate movement of offenders and initiate interventions to address and correct non-compliance; and coordinate training and education regarding regulations of interstate movement of offenders for officials involved in that activity.

The compacting states recognize that there is no right of any offender to live in another state and that duly accredited officers of a sending state may at all times enter a receiving state and there apprehend and retake any offender under supervision subject to the provisions of this compact and by-laws and rules adopted under the compact.

It is the policy of the compacting states that the activities conducted by the Interstate Commission created in this compact are the formation of public policies and are, as a result, public business.

ARTICLE II DEFINITIONS

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires a different construction,

“adult” means both individuals legally classified as adults and juveniles treated as adults by court order, statute, or operation of law;

“by-laws” means the by-laws established by the Interstate Commission for its governance, or for directing or controlling the Interstate Commission’s actions or conduct;

“compact” means the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision;

“compact administrator” means the individual in each compacting state, appointed in accordance with the terms of this compact, who is responsible for the administration and management of the state’s supervision and transfer of offenders subject to the terms of this compact, the rules adopted by the Interstate Commission, and policies adopted by the state council under this compact;

“compacting state” means any state that has enacted the enabling legislation for this compact;

“commissioner” means the voting representative of each compacting state appointed in accordance with art. III of this compact;

“Interstate Commission” means the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision established by this compact;

“member” means the commissioner of a compacting state or a designee, who shall be a person officially connected with the commissioner;

“non-compacting state” means any state that has not enacted the enabling legislation for this compact;

“offender” means an adult placed under, or subject to, supervision as the result of the commission of a criminal offense and released to the community under the jurisdiction of courts, paroling authorities, corrections, or other criminal justice agencies;

“person” means any individual, corporation, business enterprise, or other legal entity, either public or private;

“rules” means acts of the Interstate Commission, duly adopted in accordance with art. VII of this compact, substantially affecting interested parties in addition to the Interstate Commission; the rules shall have the force and effect of law in the compacting states;

“state” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia and any other territorial possessions of the United States;

“state council” means the resident members of the State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision created by each state under art. III of this compact.

ARTICLE III THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION FOR THE COMPACT

The compacting states create the “Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision.” The Interstate Commission shall be a body corporate and joint agency of the compacting states. The Interstate Commission shall have all the responsibilities, powers, and duties set out in this compact, including the power to sue and be sued, and the additional powers as may be conferred upon it by subsequent action of the respective legislatures of the compacting states in accordance with the terms of this compact.

The Interstate Commission consists of commissioners selected and appointed by resident members of a State Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision for each state. While each member state may determine the membership of its own state council, its membership must include at least one representative from the legislative, judicial, and executive branches of government, victims groups, and compact administrators. Each state council shall appoint as its commissioner the compact administrator from that state, to serve on the Interstate Commission in that capacity under or in accordance with applicable law of the member state. Each compacting state retains the right to determine the qualifications of the compact administrator, who shall be appointed by the state council or by the governor in consultation with the legislature and the judiciary. In addition to appointment of its commissioner to the national Interstate Commission, each state council shall exercise oversight and advocacy concerning its participation in Interstate Commission activities and other duties as may be determined by each member state, including development of policy concerning operations and procedures of this compact within that state.

In addition to the commissioners who are the voting representatives of each state, the Interstate Commission shall include individuals who are not commissioners but who are members of interested organizations; non-commissioner members must include a member of the national organizations of governors, legislators, state chief justices, attorneys general, and crime victims. All non-commissioner members of the Interstate Commission shall be ex-officio, nonvoting members. The Interstate Commission may provide in its by-laws for such additional, ex officio, nonvoting members as it deems necessary.

Each compacting state represented at any meeting of the Interstate Commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of the compacting states shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless a larger quorum is required by the by-laws of the Interstate Commission.

The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once each calendar year. The chairperson may call additional meetings and, upon the request of 27 or more compacting states, shall call additional meetings. Public notice shall be given of all meetings and meetings shall be open to the public.

The Interstate Commission shall establish an executive committee that shall include commission officers, members, and others as shall be determined by the by-laws. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission during periods when the Interstate Commission is not in session, with the exception of rulemaking or amendment to the compact, or both. The executive committee oversees the day-to-day activities managed by the executive director and Interstate Commission staff, administers enforcement and compliance with the provisions of this compact, its by-laws, and as directed by the Interstate Commission, and performs other duties as directed by commission or set out in the by-laws.

ARTICLE IV POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall have the following powers:

to adopt a seal and suitable by-laws governing the management and operation of the Interstate Commission;

to adopt rules that shall have the force and effect of statutory law and shall be binding in the compacting states to the extent and in the manner provided in this compact;

to oversee, supervise, and coordinate the interstate movement of offenders subject to the terms of this compact and any by-laws and rules adopted by the Interstate Commission;

to enforce compliance with compact provisions and Interstate Commission rules and by-laws, using all necessary and proper means, including the use of judicial process;

to establish and maintain offices;

to purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;

to borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including members and their staffs;

to establish and appoint committees and hire staff that it deems necessary for the carrying out of its functions, including an executive committee as required by art. III of this compact that shall have the power to act on behalf of the Interstate Commission in carrying out its powers and duties under this compact;

to elect or appoint officers, attorneys, employees, agents, or consultants, and to fix their compensation, define their duties, and determine their qualifications, and to establish the Interstate Commission’s personnel policies and programs relating to, among other things, conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualifications of personnel;

to accept any and all donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and to receive, utilize, and dispose of them;

to lease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or mixed;

to sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;

to establish a budget and make expenditures and levy dues as provided in art. IX of this compact;

to sue and be sued;

to provide for dispute resolution among the compacting states;

to perform the functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact;

to report annually to the legislatures, governors, judiciary, and state councils of the compacting states concerning the activities of the Interstate Commission during the preceding year; the reports also shall include any recommendations that may have been adopted by the Interstate Commission;

to coordinate education, training, and public awareness regarding the interstate movement of offenders for officials involved in that activity;

to establish uniform standards for the reporting, collecting, and exchanging of data.

ARTICLE V ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of its members, within 12 months of the first Interstate Commission meeting, adopt by-laws to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this compact, including

establishing the fiscal year of the Interstate Commission;

establishing an executive committee and such other committees as may be necessary;

providing reasonable standards and procedures

for the establishment of committees; and

governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the Interstate Commission;

providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the Interstate Commission, and ensuring reasonable notice of each meeting;

establishing the titles and responsibilities of the officers of the Interstate Commission;

providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the Interstate Commission; notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any compacting state, the by-laws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the Interstate Commission;

providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the Interstate Commission and the equitable return of any surplus money that may exist upon the termination of this compact after the payment or reserving, or both, of all of its debts and obligations;

providing transition rules for start-up administration of the compact;

establishing standards and procedures for compliance and technical assistance in carrying out this compact.

The Interstate Commission shall, by a majority of the members, elect from among its members a chairperson and a vice chairperson, each of whom shall have the authorities and duties as may be specified in the by-laws. The chairperson or, in the chairperson’s absence or disability, the vice chairperson, shall preside at all meetings of the Interstate Commission. The officers so elected shall serve without compensation or remuneration from the Interstate Commission except that, subject to the availability of budgeted money, the officers shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary costs and expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties and responsibilities as officers of the Interstate Commission. The Interstate Commission shall, through its executive committee, appoint or retain an executive director for the period, upon the terms and conditions, and for the compensation as the Interstate Commission may deem appropriate. The executive director shall serve as secretary to the Interstate Commission, and hire and supervise other staff as may be authorized by the Interstate Commission, but is not a member.

The Interstate Commission shall maintain its corporate books and records in accordance with the by-laws.

The members, officers, executive director, and employees of the Interstate Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; however, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability, or both, for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional, or wilful and wanton, misconduct of any such person. The Interstate Commission shall defend the commissioner of a compacting state, or the commissioner’s representatives or employees, or the Interstate Commission’s representatives or employees, in any civil action seeking to impose liability, arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the defendant had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, as long as the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from intentional wrongdoing on the part of that person. The Interstate Commission shall indemnify and hold the commissioner of a compacting state, the appointed designee or employees, or the Interstate Commission’s representatives or employees, harmless in the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against those persons arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that those persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Interstate Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, as long as the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from gross negligence or intentional wrongdoing on the part of the person.

ARTICLE VI ACTIVITIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact.

Except as otherwise provided in this compact and unless a greater percentage is required by the by-laws, in order to constitute an act of the Interstate Commission, the act shall have been taken at a meeting of the Interstate Commission and shall have received an affirmative vote of a majority of the members present.

Each member of the Interstate Commission shall have the right and power to cast a vote to which that compacting state is entitled and to participate in the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission. A member shall vote in person on behalf of the state and shall not delegate a vote to another member state. However, a state council shall appoint another authorized representative, in the absence of the commissioner from that state, to cast a vote on behalf of the member state at a specified meeting. The by-laws may provide for members’ participation in meetings by telephone or other means of telecommunication or electronic communication. Any voting conducted by telephone, or other means of telecommunication or electronic communication shall be subject to the same quorum requirements of meetings where members are present in person.

The Interstate Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. The chairperson of the Interstate Commission may call additional meetings at any time and, upon the request of a majority of the members, shall call additional meetings.

The Interstate Commission’s by-laws shall establish conditions and procedures under which the Interstate Commission shall make its information and official records available to the public for inspection or copying. The Interstate Commission may exempt from disclosure any information or official records to the extent they would adversely affect personal privacy rights or proprietary interests. In adopting such rules, the Interstate Commission may make available to law enforcement agencies records and information otherwise exempt from disclosure, and may enter into agreements with law enforcement agencies to receive or exchange information or records subject to non-disclosure and confidentiality provisions.

Public notice shall be given of all meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public, except as set out in the rules or as otherwise provided in this compact. The Interstate Commission shall adopt rules consistent with the principles contained in the Government in Sunshine Act, 5 U.S.C. 552(b), as may be amended. The Interstate Commission and any of its committees may close a meeting to the public if it determines by two-thirds vote that an open meeting would be likely to

relate solely to the Interstate Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;

disclose matters specifically exempted from disclosure by statute;

disclose trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential;

involve accusing any person of a crime, or formally censuring any person;

disclose information of a personal nature when disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;

disclose investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes;

disclose information contained in or related to examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, or on behalf of or for the use of, the Interstate Commission with respect to a regulated entity for the purpose of regulation or supervision of the entity;

disclose information, the premature disclosure of which would significantly endanger the life of a person or the stability of a regulated entity; or

specifically relate to the Interstate Commission’s issuance of a subpoena or its participation in a civil action or proceeding.

For every meeting closed under (f) of this provision, the Interstate Commission’s chief legal officer shall publicly certify that, in the legal officer’s opinion, the meeting may be closed to the public, and shall reference each relevant exemptive provision. The Interstate Commission shall keep minutes that shall fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in any meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of any actions taken, and the reasons for the action, including a description of each of the views expressed on any item and the record of any roll call vote as reflected in the vote of each member on the question. All documents considered in connection with any action shall be identified in the minutes.

The Interstate Commission shall collect standardized data concerning the interstate movement of offenders as directed through its by-laws and rules, which shall specify the data to be collected, the means of collection and data exchange, and reporting requirements.

ARTICLE VII RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall adopt rules in order to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of this compact, including transition rules governing administration of this compact during the period in which it is being considered and enacted by the states.

Rulemaking shall occur in accordance with the criteria set out in this article and the by-laws and rules adopted under it. The rulemaking shall substantially conform to the principles of the federal Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C.S. 551 et seq., and the Federal Advisory Committee Act, 5 U.S.C.S. app.2, sec. 1 et seq., as may be amended (APA).

All rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment.

If a majority of the legislatures of the compacting states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this compact, then the rule shall have no further force and effect in any compacting state.

When adopting a rule, the Interstate Commission shall

publish the proposed rule, stating with particularity the text of the rule that is proposed and the reason for the proposed rule;

allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions, and arguments, which shall be publicly available;

provide an opportunity for an informal hearing; and

adopt a final rule and its effective date, if appropriate, based on the rulemaking record.

Not later than 60 days after a rule is adopted, any interested person may file a petition in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or in the federal District Court where the Interstate Commission’s principal office is located for judicial review of the rule. If the court finds that the Interstate Commission’s action is not supported by substantial evidence, as defined in the APA, in the rulemaking record, the court shall hold the rule unlawful and set it aside.

Subjects to be addressed within 12 months after the first meeting must at a minimum include the following:

notice to victims and opportunity to be heard;

offender registration and compliance;

violations or returns, or both;

transfer procedures and forms;

eligibility for transfer;

collection of restitution and fees from offenders;

data collection and reporting;

the level of supervision to be provided by the receiving state;

transition rules governing the operation of this compact and the Interstate Commission during all or part of the period between the effective date of this compact and the date on which the last eligible state adopts this compact;

mediation, arbitration, and dispute resolution.

The existing rules governing the operation of the previous compact superseded by this Act shall be void 12 months after the first meeting of the Interstate Commission created under this compact.

Upon determination by the Interstate Commission that an emergency exists, the Interstate Commission may adopt an emergency rule, which becomes effective immediately upon adoption; however, the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as is reasonably possible, but in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule.

ARTICLE VIII OVERSIGHT, ENFORCEMENT, AND DISPUTE RESOLUTION BY THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION

The Interstate Commission shall conduct oversight as follows:

the Interstate Commission shall oversee the interstate movement of adult offenders in the compacting states and shall monitor such activities being administered in non-compacting states that may significantly affect compacting states;

the courts and executive agencies in each compacting state shall enforce this compact and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact’s purposes and intent; in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a compacting state that pertains to the subject matter of this compact and that may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the Interstate Commission, the Interstate Commission shall be entitled to receive all service of process in the proceeding, and shall have standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes.

The Interstate Commission shall conduct dispute resolution as follows:

the compacting states shall report to the Interstate Commission on issues or activities of concern to them, and cooperate with and support the Interstate Commission in the discharge of its duties and responsibilities;

the Interstate Commission shall attempt to resolve any disputes or other issues that are subject to this compact and that may arise among compacting states and non-compacting states;

the Interstate Commission shall enact a by-law or adopt a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes among the compacting states.

The Interstate Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions of this compact using any or all means set out in (b) of art. XI of this compact.

ARTICLE IX FINANCE

The Interstate Commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

The Interstate Commission shall levy on and collect an annual assessment from each compacting state to cover the cost of the internal operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff; the assessment must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, taking into consideration the population of the state and the volume of interstate movement of offenders in each compacting state, and shall adopt a rule binding upon all compacting states that governs the assessment.

The Interstate Commission shall not incur any obligations of any kind before securing money adequate to meet the obligations; nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the compacting states, except by and with the authority of the compacting state.

The Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its by-laws. However, all receipts and disbursements of money handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

ARTICLE X COMPACTING STATES, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENT

Any state, as defined in art. II of this compact, is eligible to become a compacting state.

This compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of this compact into law by no less than 35 of the states. The initial effective date shall be the later of July 1, 2001, or upon enactment into law by the 35th jurisdiction. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding, as to any other compacting state, upon enactment of this compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees will be invited to participate in Interstate Commission activities on a non-voting basis before adoption of this compact by all states and territories of the United States.

Amendments to this compact may be proposed by the Interstate Commission for enactment by the compacting states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the compacting states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the compacting states.

ARTICLE XI WITHDRAWAL, DEFAULT, TERMINATION, AND JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT

The withdrawal of a compacting state from this compact is governed by the following:

once effective, this compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every compacting state except that a compacting state may withdraw from the compact by enacting a statute specifically repealing the statute that enacted this compact into law;

the effective date of withdrawal is the effective date of the repeal of the statute;

the withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state;

the Interstate Commission shall notify the other compacting states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within 60 days of its receipt of the notification under (3) of this subsection;

the withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, including any obligations the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal;

reinstatement following withdrawal of any compacting state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting this compact or upon a later date as determined by the Interstate Commission.

A default of a compacting state is governed by the following:

if the Interstate Commission determines that any compacting state has at any time defaulted in the performance of any of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact, the by-laws, or any duly adopted rules, the Interstate Commission may impose any or all of the following penalties:

fines, fees, and costs in the amounts as are deemed to be reasonable as fixed by the Interstate Commission;

remedial training and technical assistance as directed by the Interstate Commission;

suspension and termination of membership in this compact; suspension shall be imposed only after all other reasonable means of securing compliance under the by-laws and rules have been exhausted; immediate notice of suspension shall be given by the Interstate Commission to the governor, the chief justice or chief judicial officer of the state, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and the state council; the grounds for default include failure of a compacting state to perform the obligations or responsibilities imposed upon it by this compact, Interstate Commission by-laws, or duly adopted rules; the Interstate Commission shall immediately notify the defaulting state in writing of the penalty imposed by the Interstate Commission on the defaulting state pending a cure of the default; the Interstate Commission shall stipulate the conditions and the time period within which the defaulting state must cure its default; if the defaulting state fails to cure the default within the time period specified by the Interstate Commission, in addition to any other penalties imposed in this compact the defaulting state may be terminated from this compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the compacting states and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this compact shall be terminated from the effective date of suspension;

within 60 days of the effective date of termination of a defaulting state, the Interstate Commission shall notify the governor, the chief justice or chief judicial officer, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, and the state council of the termination;

the defaulting state is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including any obligations the performance of which extends beyond the effective date of termination;

the Interstate Commission shall not bear any costs relating to the defaulting state unless otherwise mutually agreed upon between the Interstate Commission and the defaulting state;

reinstatement following termination of any compacting state requires both a reenactment of this compact by the defaulting state and the approval of the Interstate Commission in accordance with the rules.

The Interstate Commission may, by majority vote of the members, initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or, at the discretion of the Interstate Commission, in the federal district where the Interstate Commission has its offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its duly adopted rules and by-laws against any compacting state in default. If judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of the litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

Dissolution of this compact is governed by the following:

this compact dissolves effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the compacting state that reduces membership in this compact to one compacting state;

upon the dissolution of this compact, it becomes void and shall be of no further force or effect, the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be wound up, and any surplus money shall be distributed in accordance with the by-laws.

ARTICLE XII SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION

The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of this compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

ARTICLE XIII BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS

Other laws’ effects on this compact are as follows:

nothing in this compact prevents the enforcement of any other law of a compacting state that is not inconsistent with this compact;

all compacting states’ laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

Binding effect of this compact is as follows:

all lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and by-laws adopted by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the compacting states;

all agreements between the Interstate Commission and the compacting states are binding in accordance with their terms;

upon the request of a party to a conflict over meaning or interpretation of Interstate Commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the compacting states, the Interstate Commission may issue advisory opinions regarding the meaning or interpretation;

if any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any compacting state, the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction sought to be conferred by the provision upon the Interstate Commission shall be ineffective and the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction shall remain in the compacting state and shall be exercised by the agency of the compacting states to which the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect at the time this compact becomes effective.

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS 33.10.010.
Renumbered in 1985.

Administrative Code. —

For conditions of parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 5.

Editor's notes.-

Article VI(f) of this section with regard to meetings of the Interstate Commission contains a citation to 5 U.S.C. 552(b). It appears that the correct citation may actually be 5 U.S.C. 552b.

Sec. 33.36.120.
Definition. [Repealed, § 5 ch 61 SLA 2002.]

Sec. 33.36.130.
Compact administrator.

The governor shall appoint the administrator for the compact set out in AS

33.36.110

in consultation with the legislature and judiciary. The compact administrator must have a background in criminal justice.

The compact administrator is responsible for the administration and management of the state’s supervision and transfer of offenders under AS

33.36.110

, and shall report to the state council under AS

33.36.140

.

The compact administrator shall work within the Department of Corrections under the direction of the commissioner of corrections. The compact administrator serves at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 61 SLA 2002)

Sec. 33.36.135.
Review of rules.

The compact administrator shall annually, not later than January 31, provide a report on any rules that have been adopted by the Interstate Commission during the previous calendar year to the legislature. The legislature shall review the rules to determine if the compact should be repealed, amended, or permitted to continue. In this section, “compact,” “compact administrator,” and “Interstate Commission,” have the meanings given in AS

33.36.110

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 61 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as uncodified law in § 8, ch. 61, SLA 2002. Codified in 2002.